Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 59-1401 to 59-1406 shall be known and may be cited as the Music Licensing Agency Act.

Laws 1945, c. 139, § 1, p. 439;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 376;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 30.